Maryland, session 2026, HB0798.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
5–1501.
(a) In this section, “eligible fund manager” means:
(1) an entity that has significant financial or investment experience, under
criteria developed by the Department; and
(2) includes an entity that the Department designates to manage funds
received under subsection (c)(1) of this section.
(g) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, an eligible fund manager
may use money from grants received under this section to pay expenses for administrative,
actuarial, legal, and technical services.
(2) The Department shall set the maximum amount of grant money that
each eligible fund manager may use under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(3) (I) IN ADDITION TO OR IN LIEU OF THE AMOUNT AUTHORIZED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT MAY AUTHORIZE
AN ELIGIBLE FUND MANAGER TO RECEIVE A MANAGEMENT FEE THAT IS
CALCULATED AS A PERCENTAGE OF EACH LOAN MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF
THIS SECTION.
(II) THE PERCENTAGE AUTHORIZED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT BE LESS THAN 1.5% AND MAY NOT EXCEED 3% OF THE
TOTAL LOAN PRINCIPAL.
(III) A MANAGEMENT FEE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL BE PAID FROM THE ACCOUNT AND MAY BE RETAINED BY AN
ELIGIBLE FUND MANAGER FOR ADMINISTRATIVE PURPOSES RELATED TO LENDING
ACTIVITIES UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 798 3
(4) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ESTABLISH AN ANNUAL CAP ON THE
CUMULATIVE AMOUNT OF MANAGEMENT FEES AN ELIGIBLE FUND MANAGER MAY
RECEIVE UNDER PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.